DTC B1317 [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


id0102c3842200

DTC B1317

Fuel additive control module B+ voltage high

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The fuel additive control module monitors the supply voltage of battery positive terminal at fuel additive control module terminals 1 and 8. If the Fuel additive control module detected battery positive terminal voltage above 16 V, the fuel additive control module determines that the power supply system has malfunction.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Short to power circuit between generator connector terminal D and PCM connector terminal 107
•  Generator malfunction
•  Fuel additive control module and/or generator are poorly connected

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
INSPECT POOR CONNECTION OF GENERATOR CONNECTOR
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Disconnect generator connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection
(damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
•  Is there a malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace terminals, then go to Step 8.
No
Go to the next step.
4
CLASSIFY GENERATOR MALFUNCTION OR OTHER MALFUNCTION
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure voltage between generator terminal D (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Malfunction at generator.
Go to Step 7.
5
INSPECT POOR CONNECTION OF PCM CONNECTOR
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Disconnect PCM connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection
(damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
•  Is there a malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace pins, then go to Step 8.
No
Go to the next step.
6
INSPECT GENERATOR CONTROL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure voltage between generator terminal D (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Repair or replace the wiring harness for short to power supply, then go to Step 8.
No
Go to Step 8.
7
INSPECT GENERATOR CONTROL TERMINAL FOR SHORT TO POWER
•  Measure voltage between generator terminal D (part-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Repair or replace generator, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
8
VERIFY THAT DTC B1317 TROUBLESHOOTING IS COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Clear DTC from PCM memory using M-MDS.
•  Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Replace the Fuel additive control module, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
9
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the after repair procedure.
•  Are any DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
No
DTC troubleshooting completed.